Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-8401
Act, how cited.

Sections 44-8401 to 44-8404 shall be known
and may be cited as the Mandate Opt-Out and Insurance Coverage Clarification
Act.

Laws 2011, LB22, § 1.